Hawaii statutes.
[§187A-32] Alien aquatic organisms; lead
agency; rules. (a) The department is designated as the lead state agency
for preventing the introduction and carrying out the destruction of alien
aquatic organisms through the regulation of ballast water discharges and hull
fouling organisms. The department may establish an interagency team to address
the concerns relating to alien aquatic organisms.

(b) The department may adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91, including penalties, to carry out the purposes of
this part. The rules may include standards for the department and the United
States Coast Guard to use as part of their respective inspection protocols.
The rules may also include implementation of a course of action in relation to
the arrival or pending arrival of a high risk vessel.

(c) The governor may enter into an agreement
with the United States Secretary of Transportation to carry out the purposes of
this part, including but not limited to the enforcement of state law. [L 2000,
c 134, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next